District of Columbia statutes.
38-752.02

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Post-secondary institution” means an entity that awards an academic degree or professional certification, which may include a:

(A)

University;

(B)

College;

(C)

Seminary;

(D)

Vocational school;

(E)

Trade school; or

(F)

The military.

(2)

“Public high school” means a public school or public charter school that provides instruction for students in the 9th through 12th grades.

History

June 19, 2012, D.C. Law 19-142, § 202, 59 DCR 3642